Louisiana, session 2026, SB372.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1870(D)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1870. Pharmacy benefit manager transparency report; examination by
commissioner
* * *
D.(1)(a) The commissioner may examine the books or records of a pharmacy
benefit manager to determine the accuracy of the transparency report. The
commissioner shall have access to any information he considers necessary to
determine the accuracy of the transparency report including but not limited to
individual amounts paid by a health insurance issuer to the pharmacy benefit
manager for drugs, devices, or services provided by a pharmacist or pharmacy, and
the individual amount a pharmacy benefit manager paid to a pharmacist or pharmacy
for the same drug, device, or service.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-67 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 372
(b) The commissioner may also examine the books or records of any
entity in a pharmacy benefit manager's corporate vertical structure, including
but not limited to the insurer, group purchasing organization, manufacturer,
wholesale distributor, special or mail order pharmacy, retail or long-term care
pharmacy, and provider.
* * *